New Mexico, session 2026, SB48.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO:
SECTION 1. Section 6-35-1 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 2025,
Chapter 83, Section 1) is amended to read:
"6-35-1. SHORT TITLE.--Chapter 6, Article 35 NMSA 1978
may be cited as the "State Fairgrounds District Act"."
SECTION 2. A new section of the State Fairgrounds
District Act is enacted to read:
"AUTHORIZATION OF ISSUANCE OF BONDS.--The legislature
authorizes and approves the district to issue bonds, pursuant
to the provisions of Paragraph (5) of Subsection C of Section
6-35-7 NMSA 1978, in an amount not to exceed ninety-two
million dollars ($92,000,000) in net proceeds of the five
hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) in net proceeds
authorized to be issued by the district by Subsection A of
Section 6-35-7 NMSA 1978, secured by all or a portion of the
gross receipts tax distribution and the gaming tax
distribution made pursuant to the provisions of Section
7-1-6.73 NMSA 1978, pledged to pay the principal of and
interest on the bonds, with such issuance of bonds by the SB 48
Page 1

district pursuant to the provisions of the State Fairgrounds
District Act." SB 48
Page 2